Tennessee statutes. Title 5 Counties
Chapter 18

County Historian

5-18-101. In general.

The legislative body of each county shall appoint some person of the county as county historian, who shall serve without compensation and whose duties shall include, but not be limited to, collecting and preserving local and state history, and in doing so, to work with, in such manner as may mutually be agreed upon, the state historian, the state library and archives and the Tennessee historical commission.

Acts 1965, ch. 45, § 1; T.C.A., § 5-1801.

Cross-References. County officers, § 5-1-104.

State historian, §§ 4-11-101, 10-1-101.

State historical commission, §§ 4-11-102 — 4-11-110.